Wisconsin, session 2025, AB882.
do enact as follows:AB882,1Section 1. 82.03 (5) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:82.03 (5) (ag) Notwithstanding s. 31.02 (2), the town board may prescribe the maximum water elevation for an artificial water body created by a dam that includes the use of a diversion pump and that is located in the town if the town board has determined that a certain water elevation of that water body causes the road bed of a highway in the town to be saturated.AB882,2Section 2. 82.03 (5) (c) of the statutes is renumbered 82.03 (5) (b) 3.AB882,3Section 3. 88.90 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:88.90 (1) Whenever any natural watercourse becomes obstructed so that the natural flow of water along the same is retarded by the negligent action of the owner, occupant, or person in charge of the land on which the obstruction is located, the owner or occupant of any lands damaged due to ground or surface water flooding caused by such obstruction may request the removal thereof by giving notice in writing to such owner, occupant, or person in charge of the land on which the obstruction is located. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab882 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab882 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB882 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB882 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB882: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting